North Dakota, session 69, HB1260.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Subsection 10 of section 20.1-03-11 of the North Dakota Century Code
is amended and reenacted as follows:
10. Fifteen percent of the total mule deer licenses and permits to hunt mule deer made available
in the immediately precedingcurrent year for the regular gun season must be made available
to nonresidents to hunt any deer with bow and arrow.

H. B. NO. 1260 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1260.
House Vote: Yeas 87 Nays 3 Absent 4
Senate Vote: Yeas 45 Nays 1 Absent 1
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State